local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
   <pardef n="но/га__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>га</l>
         <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>зе</l>
         <r>га<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="сел/о__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>о</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="прило/г__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>г</l>
         <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>зи</l>
         <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="Загреб__np">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="Бранко__np">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <pardef n="Марија__np">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
     </e>
   </pardef>

   <!-- Глаголи -->

    <pardef n="/е__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сум</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>си</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>сте</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>се</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="има__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>с</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ме</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r><s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="мож/е__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ес</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="сме/е__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ес</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="вик/а__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ај</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аш</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аме</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ате</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аат</l>
          <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="зна/е__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>м</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>те</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="пред/е__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еш</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еме</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>е<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <e lm="нога"><i>но</i><par n="но/га__n"/></e>
   <e lm="село"><i>сел</i><par n="сел/о__n"/></e>
   <e lm="прилог"><i>прило</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
   <e lm="предлог"><i>предло</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
   <e lm="Марија"><i>Марија</i><par n="Марија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Лабина"><i>Лабина</i><par n="Марија__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Бранко"><i>Бранко</i><par n="Бранко__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Дејан"><i>Дејан</i><par n="Бранко__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Слободан"><i>Слободан</i><par n="Бранко__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Загреб"><i>Загреб</i><par n="Загреб__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Београд"><i>Београд</i><par n="Загреб__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Софија"><i>Софија</i><par n="Загреб__np"/></e>
   <e lm="Пловдив"><i>Пловдив</i><par n="Загреб__np"/></e>
   <e lm="е"><i/><par n="/е__vbser"/></e>
   <e lm="има"><i>има</i><par n="има__vbhaver"/></e>
   <e lm="може"><i>мож</i><par n="мож/е__vbmod"/></e>
   <e lm="смее"><i>сме</i><par n="сме/е__vbmod"/></e>
   <e lm="знае"><par n="не__pref"/><i>зна</i><par n="зна/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="преде"><i>пред</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="јаде"><i>јад</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пие"><i>пи</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="спие"><i>спи</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пере"><i>пер</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="сере"><i>сер</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пе"><i>пее</i><par n="пред/е__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="вика"><i>вик</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="чита"><i>чит</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="зборува"><i>зборув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="пишува"><i>пишув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="прашува"><par n="не__pref"/><i>прашув</i><par n="вик/а__vblex"/></e>
